Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.080

Borrowers unable to obtain loans—Mortgage broker to provide copies of certain documents—Conditions—Exceptions.

Except as otherwise required by the United States Code or the Code of Federal Regulations, now or as amended, if a borrower is unable to obtain a loan for any reason and the borrower has paid for an appraisal, title report, or credit report in full, the mortgage broker shall give a copy of the appraisal, title report, or credit report to the borrower and transmit the originals to any other mortgage broker or lender to whom the borrower directs that the documents be transmitted. Regardless of whether the borrower has obtained a loan, the mortgage broker must provide the copies or transmit the documents within five days after the borrower has made the request in writing.

[ 1997 c 106 s 7; 1987 c 391 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—1997 c 106: See note following RCW 19.146.010.